New York, session 2025-2026, A542.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3302 of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 42 to read as follows: 3 42. "Fentanyl analogue" (a) means any substance that is structurally 4 related to fentanyl by one or more of the following modifications: 5 (i) replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any 6 monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the monocycle; 7 (ii) substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl, 8 alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino or nitro groups; 9 (iii) substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl, alkenyl, 10 alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino or nitro groups; 11 (iv) replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle 12 whether or not further substituted in or on the aromatic monocycle; 13 and/or 14 (v) replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group. 15 (b) such term shall not include: 16 (i) fentanyl; 17 (ii) any substance for which there is an approved new drug application 18 by the Federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA); or 19 (iii) with respect to a particular person, any substance, if an 20 exemption is in effect for investigational use for that person, as 21 provided by 21 U.S.C. § 355, to the extent conduct with respect to the 22 substance is pursuant to such exemption. 23 § 2. Subdivision (b) of schedule I of section 3306 of the public 24 health law is amended by adding a new paragraph 93 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02434-01-5 A. 542 2 1 (93) Any fentanyl analogue. 2 § 3. Section 220.00 of the penal law is amended by adding a new subdi- 3 vision 21 to read as follows: 4 21. "Knowingly" when used in connection with an offense involving the 5 possession or sale, or the attempt or conspiracy to possess or sell a 6 fentanyl analogue, shall not require knowledge by a person of the chemi- 7 cal structure of the substance. 8 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.